Utah statutes.
53-3-404.   Requirements to drive commercial motor vehicle.

(1)  A person may not drive a commercial motor vehicle, unless the person has been issued and is in immediate possession of:

(a)  a CDL license certificate valid for the commercial motor vehicle the person is driving; or

(b)  a valid CDIP license certificate in accordance with Section 53-3-408.

(2) (a)  A licensee shall display a CDL or CDIP license certificate upon demand of a justice court judge, a peace officer, a special function officer, a port-of-entry officer, or a designee of the division.

(b)  It is a defense to a charge under this section that the person charged produces in court a CDL or CDIP license certificate that is issued to the person and valid at the time of the citation or arrest.

(3)  A person may not drive a commercial motor vehicle if the person's privilege to drive a commercial motor vehicle is:

(a)  suspended, revoked, or canceled;

(b)  subject to a disqualification;

(c)  subject to an out-of-service order; or

(d)  not medically certified as defined in Section 53-3-402.

(4)  A person may not drive a commercial motor vehicle if the commercial motor vehicle is subject to an out-of-service order.



Amended by Chapter 190, 2011 General Session

